District of Columbia statutes.
47-2606

Annual statements; filing fee.

Each of such companies shall file an annual statement, in the form prescribed by the Superintendent, before March 1 of each year, of its operations for the year ending December 31 immediately preceding. Such statement shall be verified by oath of the president and secretary or in their absence by 2 other principal officers. The fee for filing said statement shall be $50 and payment thereof shall be collected by the Superintendent and made payable to the District of Columbia.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 675, ch. 690, title II, § 4
Feb. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-52, § 8, 27 DCR 26
renumbered as § 6, Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2606.
1973 Ed., § 47-1804.

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2603.